North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-32.1 Uniform Limited Liability Company Act
10-32.1-58.
Filings required for a merger or exchange — Effective date.

After each constituent organization has approved a plan of merger or exchange, articles of merger or exchange must be signed on behalf of:

Each constituent limited liability company, as provided in subsection 47 of section 10-32.1-02; and

Each other constituent organization, as provided in its governing statute.

Articles of merger under this section must include:

The name and form of each constituent organization and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

The name and form of the surviving organization, the jurisdiction of its governing statute, and, if the surviving organization is created by the merger, then a statement to that effect;

The date the merger is effective under the governing statute of the surviving organization;

If the surviving organization is to be created by the merger:

If it will be a limited liability company, then the articles of organization of the company; or

If it will be an organization other than a limited liability company, then the organizational document that creates the organization that is in a public record;

If the surviving organization pre-exists the merger, then any amendments provided for in the plan of merger for the organizational document that created the organization that are in a public record;

A statement as to each constituent organization that the merger was approved as required by the governing statute of the organization;

If the surviving organization is a foreign organization not authorized to transact business in this state, then the address of an office that the secretary of state may use for the purposes of subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-59; and

Any additional information required by the governing statute of any constituent organization.

Articles of exchange under this section must include:

The name and form of each constituent organization and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

The manner and basis of exchanging the ownership interests to be acquired for securities of, or other ownership interests in, the acquiring organization or any other organization or, in whole or part, for money or other property;

The date the exchange is effective under the governing statute of the acquiring organization;

A statement as to each constituent organization that the exchange was approved as required by the governing statute of the organization; and

Any additional information required by the governing statute of any constituent organization.

The articles of merger or exchange, together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92, shall be filed with the secretary of state.

With respect to the effective date of merger or exchange:

A merger becomes effective under sections 10-32.1-55 through 10-32.1-59 and 10-32.1-71:

If the surviving organization is a limited liability company, then upon the later of:

Compliance with subsection 4; or

Subject to subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-86, the effective date specified in the articles of merger; or

If the surviving organization is not a limited liability company, then as provided by the governing statute of the surviving organization.

An exchange becomes effective under sections 10-32.1-55 through 10-32.1-58, 10-32.1-60, and 10-32.1-71 upon the later of:

Compliance with subsection 4; or

Subject to subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-86, the effective date specified in the articles of exchange.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-59.
Effect of a merger.

When a merger becomes effective:

The surviving organization continues or comes into existence;

Each constituent organization that merges into the surviving organization ceases to exist as a separate entity;

All property owned by each constituent organization that ceases to exist vests in the surviving organization upon compliance with the transfer requirements of applicable law;

All debts, obligations, or other liabilities of each constituent organization that ceases to exist continue as debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the surviving organization;

An action or proceeding pending by or against any constituent organization that ceases to exist may be continued as if the merger had not occurred;

Except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of each constituent organization that ceases to exist vest in the surviving organization;

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of merger, the terms and conditions of the plan of merger take effect;

Except as otherwise agreed, if a constituent limited liability company ceases to exist, then the merger does not dissolve the limited liability company for the purposes of sections 10-32.1-50 through 10-32.1-54;

If the surviving organization is created by the merger:

If it is a limited liability company, then the articles of organization become effective; or

If it is an organization other than a limited liability company, then the originating record that creates the organization becomes effective; and

If the surviving organization pre-existed the merger, then any amendments provided for in the articles of merger or the originating record that created the organization become effective.

A surviving organization that is a foreign organization consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any debt, obligation, or other liability owed by a constituent organization if before the merger the constituent organization was subject to suit in this state on the debt, obligation, or other liability. A surviving organization that is a foreign organization and not authorized to transact business in this state appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process for the purposes of enforcing a debt, obligation, or other liability under this subsection. Service of process on the secretary of state under this subsection must be made in the same manner and has the same consequences as in section 10-32.1-19.

As to any limited liability company that was a constituent organization and is not the surviving constituent organization, the articles of merger serve as the articles of dissolution and termination and, unless previously filed, the notice of dissolution.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-60.
Effect of an exchange.

When an exchange becomes effective, the membership interests in a limited liability company to be exchanged under the terms of the plan are considered to be exchanged. The members owning those membership interests are entitled only to the ownership interests, securities, money, or other property into which those membership interests have been converted or for which those membership interests have been exchanged according to the plan.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-61.
Conversion.

An organization other than a limited liability company may convert to a limited liability company, and a limited liability company may convert to another organization other than a general partnership as provided in this section, sections 10-32.1-62 through 10-32.1-66, and 10-32.1-71 and a plan of conversion, if:

The governing statute of the other organization authorizes the conversion;

The conversion is not prohibited by the law of the jurisdiction that enacted the governing statute; and

The other organization complies with its governing statute in effecting the conversion.

For the purposes of sections 10-32.1-61 through 10-32.1-66 and 10-32.1-71, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Act of the board” means action by the board as provided in section 10-32.1-39 whether:

At a meeting of the board; or

By a written action of the board.

“Act of the members” means action by the members as provided in section 10-32.1-39 whether:

At a meeting of the members; or

By a written action of the members.

“Certificate of creation” means:

A certificate of incorporation, if the converted organization is a corporation deemed to be incorporated under chapter 10-19.1;

A certificate of organization, if the converted organization is a limited liability company deemed to be organized under this chapter;

A certificate of limited partnership, if the converted organization is a limited partnership deemed to be formed under chapter 45-10.2;

The filed registration of a limited liability partnership, if the converted organization is a limited liability partnership deemed to be established under chapter 45-22; or

A certificate of limited liability limited partnership, if the converted organization is a limited liability limited partnership deemed to be formed under chapter 45-23.

“Date of origin” means the date on which:

A corporation which is:

The converting organization was incorporated; or

The converted organization is deemed to be incorporated;

A limited liability company which is:

The converting organization was organized; or

The converted organization is deemed to be organized;

A general partnership that is the converting organization was formed;

A limited partnership which is:

The converting organization was formed; or

The converted organization is deemed to be formed;

A limited liability partnership which is:

The converting organization was formed; or

The converted organization is deemed to be formed; and

A limited liability limited partnership which is:

The converting organization was formed; or

The converted organization is deemed to be formed.

“Filed registration” means the registration of a limited liability partnership which has been filed with the secretary of state.

“General partnership” means an organization formed by two or more persons under chapters 45-13 through 45-21.

“Organizational records” means for an organization that is:

A corporation, its articles of incorporation and bylaws;

A limited liability company, its articles of organization, operating agreement or bylaws, and any member-control agreement;

A limited partnership, its partnership agreement;

A limited liability partnership, its partnership agreement; or

A limited liability limited partnership, its partnership agreement.

“Originating records” has the meaning provided in subsection 39 of section 10-32.1-02.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-62.
Plan of conversion.

A plan of conversion must be in a record and must contain:

The name and form of the converting organization before conversion;

The name and form of the converted organization after conversion;

The terms and conditions of the proposed conversion;

The manner and basis of converting each ownership interest in the converting organization into ownership interests in the converted organization or, in whole or in part, into money or other property;

The organizational records of the converted organization; and

Any other provisions with respect to the proposed conversion that are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-63.
Plan approval and amendment.

If the converting organization is a limited liability company, then:

A resolution containing or amending the plan of conversion must be approved by an act of the board of the converting limited liability company and must then be approved by an act of its members.

In the action by the members, a class or series of membership interests is entitled to vote as a class or series on the approval or amendment of the plan.

Any amendment of the plan is subject to any contractual rights.

If the resolution containing or amending the plan of conversion is approved by the members:

At a member meeting, then:

Written notice must be given to every member of the converting limited liability company, whether or not entitled to vote at the meeting, not less than fourteen days nor more than fifty days before the meeting, in the manner provided in subsection 34 of section 10-32.1-02.

The written notice must state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider the proposed plan of conversion or an amendment to it.

A copy or short description of the plan of conversion or the amendment to it must be included in or enclosed with the notice.

By a written action of the members, then a copy or short description of the plan of conversion or the amendment to it must be included in or attached to the written action.

If the converting organization is not a limited liability company, then the approval and amendment of the plan of conversion must comply with its governing statute in effecting the conversion.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-64.
Articles of conversion.

Upon receiving the approval required by section 10-32.1-63, articles of conversion must be prepared in a record that must contain:

A statement that the converting organization is being converted into another organization, including:

The name of the converting organization immediately before the filing of the articles of conversion;

The name to which the name of the converting organization is to be changed, which must be a name that satisfies the laws applicable to the converted organization;

The form of organization that the converted organization will be; and

The jurisdiction of the governing statute of the converted organization;

A statement that the plan of conversion has been approved by the converting organization as provided in section 10-32.1-63;

A statement that the plan of conversion has been approved as required by the governing statute of the converted organization;

The plan of conversion without organizational records;

A copy of the originating record of the converted organization;

If the converted organization is a foreign organization not authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state, then the street and mailing address of an office which the secretary of state may use for the purposes of subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-66; and

If the converting organization is a general partnership, then the date of origin of the general partnership.

The articles of conversion must be signed on behalf of the converting organization and filed with the secretary of state.

If the converted organization is a domestic organization:

Then the filing of the articles of conversion must also include the filing with the secretary of state of the originating record of the converted organization.

Upon both the articles of conversion and the originating record of the converted organization being filed with the secretary of state together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of conversion and the appropriate certificate of creation to the converted organization or its legal representative.

If the converted organization is a foreign organization:

That is transacting business or conducting activities in this state, then:

The filing of the articles of conversion must include the filing with the secretary of state of an application for a certificate of authority by the converted organization.

Upon both the articles of conversion and the application for a certificate of authority by the converted organization being filed with the secretary of state together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of conversion and the appropriate certificate of authority to the converted organization or the legal representative.

That is not transacting business or conducting activities in this state, then, upon the articles of conversion being filed with the secretary of state together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of conversion to the converted organization or its legal representative.

A converting organization that is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, is a general partner in a limited partnership or a limited liability limited partnership, or is a managing partner of a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state must change or amend the name of the converting organization to the name of the converted organization in each registration when filing the articles of conversion.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-65.
Abandonment of a conversion.

If the articles of conversion have not been filed with the secretary of state, and:

If the converting organization is a limited liability company, then:

Before a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting limited liability company as provided in section 10-32.1-63, it may be abandoned by an act of its board.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting limited liability company as provided in section 10-32.1-63, and before the effective date of the plan, it may be abandoned:

If the members of the converting limited liability company entitled to vote on the approval of the plan as provided in section 10-32.1-63 have approved the abandonment by an act of the members; or

If the plan provides for abandonment and if all conditions for abandonment set forth in the plan are met.

If the converting organization is not a limited liability company, then the abandonment of the plan of conversion must comply with its governing statute.

If articles of conversion have been filed with the secretary of state, but have not yet become effective, then the converting organization shall file with the secretary of state articles of abandonment that contain:

The name of the converting organization;

The provision of this section under which the plan is abandoned; and

If the plan is abandoned:

By an act of the board under paragraph 1 of subdivision a of subsection 1, or by an act of the members under subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 1, then the text of the resolution abandoning the plan; or

As provided in the plan under subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 1, then a statement that the plan provides for abandonment and that all conditions for abandonment set forth in the plan are met.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-66.
Effective date of conversion — Effect.

A conversion is effective when the filing requirements of subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-64 have been fulfilled or on a later date specified in the articles of conversion.

With respect to the effect of conversion on the converting organization and on the converted organization:

An organization that has been converted as provided in sections 10-32.1-61 through 10-32.1-66 is for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

Upon a conversion becoming effective:

If the converted organization:

Is a limited liability company, then the converted organization has all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers, and is subject to all the duties and liabilities, of a limited liability company organized under this chapter; or

Is not a limited liability company, then the converted organization has all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers, and is subject to the duties and liabilities as provided in its governing statute;

All property owned by the converting organization remains vested in the converted organization;

All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of the converting organization continue as obligations of the converted organization;

An action or proceeding pending by or against the converting organization may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred;

Except as otherwise provided by other law, all rights, privileges, immunities, and powers of the converting organization remain vested in the converted organization; and

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the terms and conditions of the plan of conversion take effect.

When a conversion becomes effective, each ownership interest in the converting organization is deemed to be converted into ownership interests in the converted organization or, in whole or in part, into money or other property to be received under the plan, subject to any rights of a dissenter under section 10-32.1-33.

A converted organization that is a foreign organization consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any obligation owed by the converting limited liability company, if before the conversion the converting limited liability company was subject to suit in this state on the obligation.

A converted organization that is a foreign organization and not authorized to transact business in this state appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process for purposes of enforcing an obligation under this subsection as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-67.
Domestication.

A foreign limited liability company may become a limited liability company pursuant to this section, sections 10-32.1-67 through 10-32.1-71, and a plan of domestication if:

The governing statute of the foreign limited liability company authorizes the domestication;

The domestication is not prohibited by the law of the jurisdiction that enacted the governing statute; and

The foreign limited liability company complies with its governing statute in effecting the domestication.

A limited liability company may become a foreign limited liability company pursuant to this section, sections 10-32.1-67 through 10-32.1-71, and a plan of domestication if:

The governing statute of the foreign limited liability company authorizes the domestication;

The domestication is not prohibited by the law of the jurisdiction that enacted the governing statute; and

The foreign limited liability company complies with its governing statute in effecting the domestication.

A plan of domestication must be in a record and must include:

The name of the domesticating company before domestication and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

The name of the domesticated company after domestication and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

The terms and conditions of the domestication, including the manner and basis for converting interests in the domesticating company into any combination of money, interests in the domesticated company, and other consideration; and

The originating record of the domesticated company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-68.
Action on a plan of domestication by a domesticating limited liability company.

A plan of domestication must be consented to:

By all the members, subject to section 10-32.1-71, if the domesticating company is a limited liability company; and

As provided in the governing statute of the domesticating company if the company is a foreign limited liability company.

Subject to any contractual rights, after a domestication is approved, and at any time before articles of domestication are filed with the secretary of state under section 10-32.1-69, a domesticating limited liability company may amend the plan or abandon the domestication:

As provided in the plan; or

Except as otherwise prohibited in the plan, by the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-69.
Filings required for domestication — Effective date.

After a plan of domestication is approved, a domesticating company shall file with the secretary of state articles of domestication, together with the fees provided under section 10-32.1-92, which articles of domestication must include:

A statement, as the case may be, that the company has been domesticated from or into another jurisdiction;

The name of the domesticating company and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

The name of the domesticated company and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

The date the domestication is effective under the governing statute of the domesticated company;

If the domesticating company was a limited liability company, then a statement that the domestication was approved as required by this chapter;

If the domesticating company was a foreign limited liability company, then a statement that the domestication was approved as required by the governing statute of the other jurisdiction; and

If the domesticated company was a foreign limited liability company not authorized to transact business in this state, then the address of an office that the secretary of state may use for the purposes of subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-70.

A domestication becomes effective:

When the articles of organization takes effect, if the domesticated company is a limited liability company; and

According to the governing statute of the domesticated company, if the domesticated organization is a foreign limited liability company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-70.
Effect of domestication.

When a domestication takes effect:

The domesticated company is for all purposes the company that existed before the domestication;

All property owned by the domesticating company remains vested in the domesticated company;

All debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the domesticating company continue as debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the domesticated company;

An action or proceeding pending by or against a domesticating company may be continued as if the domestication had not occurred;

Except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the domesticating company remain vested in the domesticated company;

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of domestication, the terms and conditions of the plan of domestication take effect; and

Except as otherwise agreed, the domestication does not dissolve a domesticating limited liability company for the purposes of sections 10-32.1-50 through 10-32.1-54.

A domesticated company that is a foreign limited liability company consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any debt, obligation, or other liability owed by the domesticating company if, before the domestication, the domesticating company was subject to suit in this state on the debt, obligation, or other liability. A domesticated company that is a foreign limited liability company and not authorized to transact business in this state appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process for purposes of enforcing a debt, obligation, or other liability under this subsection. Service on the secretary of state under this subsection must be made in the same manner and has the same consequences as in section 10-32.1-19.

If a limited liability company has adopted and approved a plan of domestication under section 10-32.1-68 providing for the company to be domesticated in a foreign jurisdiction, then a statement surrendering the articles of organization of the company must be filed with the secretary of state setting forth:

The name of the company;

A statement that the articles of organization are being surrendered in connection with the domestication of the company in a foreign jurisdiction;

A statement that the domestication was approved as required by this chapter; and

The jurisdiction of formation of the domesticated foreign limited liability company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-71.
Restrictions on approval of mergers, exchanges, conversions, and domestications.

If a member of a constituent, converting, or domesticating limited liability company will have personal liability with respect to a surviving, constituent, converted, or domesticated organization, then approval or amendment of a plan of merger, exchange, conversion, or domestication is ineffective without the consent of the member, unless:

The operating agreement of the company provides for approval of a merger, exchange, conversion, or domestication with the consent of fewer than all the members; and

The member has consented to the provision of the operating agreement.

A member does not give the consent required by subsection 1 merely by consenting to a provision of the operating agreement that permits the operating agreement to be amended with the consent of fewer than all the members.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-72.
Foreign limited liability company — Governing law.

The law of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign limited liability company is formed governs:

The internal affairs of the company; and

The liability of a member as member, a manager as manager, and a governor as governor for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the company.

A foreign limited liability company may not be denied a certificate of authority by reason of any difference between the law of the jurisdiction under which the company is formed and the law of this state.

A foreign limited liability company holding a valid certificate of authority in this state has no greater rights and privileges than a domestic limited liability company. A certificate of authority does not authorize a foreign limited liability company to engage in any business or exercise any power that a limited liability company may not engage in or exercise in this state.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-73.
Foreign limited liability company — Name.

A foreign limited liability company may apply for a certificate of authority under any name that would be available to a domestic limited liability company, whether or not the name is the name under which it is authorized in its jurisdiction of organization. A trade name must be registered as provided in chapter 47-25 when applying for the certificate of authority under a name other than the name as authorized in the jurisdiction of origin.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-74.
Foreign limited liability company — Admission of foreign limited liability company — Transacting business — Obtaining licenses and permits.

A foreign limited liability company may not:

Transact business in this state or obtain any license or permit required by this state until it has procured a certificate of authority from the secretary of state.

Transact in this state any business that is prohibited to a domestic limited liability company organized under this chapter.

Be denied a certificate of authority because the laws of the state or country where the limited liability company is organized differ from the laws of this state.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-75.
Foreign limited liability company — Application for a certificate of authority.

An applicant for the certificate shall file with the secretary of state a certificate of status from the filing office in the jurisdiction in which the foreign limited liability company is organized and an application executed by an authorized person and setting forth:

The name of the foreign limited liability company and, if different, the name under which it proposes to transact business in this state;

The jurisdiction of its organization;

With respect to a registered agent:

The name of the commercial registered agent as required by chapter 10-01.1; or

If a noncommercial registered agent, then the name and address in this state of the noncommercial registered agent;

The date, if any, on which the foreign limited liability company expires in the jurisdiction of its organization;

The purpose the foreign limited liability company proposes to pursue in transacting its business in this state;

The names and addresses of the governors and managers of the foreign limited liability company; and

Any additional information deemed appropriate by the secretary of state to determine whether the foreign limited liability company is entitled to a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

The application must be accompanied by payment of the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92 together with a certificate of good standing or a certificate of existence duly authenticated by the organizing officer of the state or country where the foreign limited liability company is organized.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-76.
Foreign limited liability company — Issuance of a certificate of authority.

If the secretary of state finds that an application for a certificate of authority conforms to law and all fees provided in section 10-32.1-92 have been paid, then the secretary of state shall:

Endorse on the application the word “filed” and the date of the filing;

File the application and the certificate of good standing or certificate of existence; and

Issue to the foreign limited liability company or its representative a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-77.
Foreign limited liability company — Amendments to a certificate of authority.

If any statement in the application for a certificate of authority by a foreign limited liability company is false when made or if the foreign limited liability company changes the name of the foreign limited liability company or purposes sought in this state, then the foreign limited liability company promptly shall file with the secretary of state an application for an amended certificate of authority executed by an authorized person correcting the statement and in the case of a change in the name of the foreign limited liability company, a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which the foreign limited liability company is organized.

In the case of a termination or merger, a foreign limited liability company that is not the surviving organization need not file an application for an amended certificate of authority but shall promptly file with the secretary of state a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which the foreign limited liability company is organized.

A foreign limited liability company that changes the name of the foreign limited liability company and applies for an amended certificate of authority and that is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, a general partner in a limited partnership or a limited liability limited partnership, or a managing partner in a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state shall change the name of the foreign limited liability company in each of the foregoing registrations which is applicable when the foreign limited liability company files an application for an amended certificate of authority.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-78.
Foreign limited liability company — Registered agent — Registered office.

A foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state shall continuously maintain a registered agent and registered office in this state as provided in chapter 10-01.1.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-79.
Foreign limited liability company — Merger of a foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state.

If a foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state is a party to a statutory merger permitted by the laws of the state or country under which the foreign limited liability company is organized, and the limited liability company is not the surviving organization, then the surviving organization shall, within thirty days after the merger becomes effective, file with the secretary of state a certified statement of merger duly authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country where the statutory merger was effected. Any foreign organization, which is the surviving organization in a merger and which will continue to transact business in this state, shall procure a certificate of authority if not previously authorized to transact business in this state.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-80.
Foreign limited liability company — Conversion of a foreign limited liability authorized to transact business in this state.

If a foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state converts to another organization permitted by its governing statute, then within thirty days after the conversion becomes effective, the newly created organization resulting from the conversion shall file with the secretary of state a certified statement of conversion duly authenticated by the proper officer of the jurisdiction in which the statutory conversion was effected. Any foreign organization that is the converted organization in a conversion and which will continue to transact business in this state shall obtain a certificate of authority or applicable registration in accordance with the North Dakota governing statute applicable to the converted organization.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-81.
Foreign limited liability company — Certificate of withdrawal.

A foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state may withdraw from this state upon procuring from the secretary of state a certificate of withdrawal. In order to procure the certificate, the foreign limited liability company shall file with the secretary of state an application for withdrawal, together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92, which must set forth:

The name of the foreign limited liability company and the state or country under the laws of which it is organized;

That the foreign limited liability company is not transacting business in this state;

That the foreign limited liability company surrenders its authority to transact business in this state;

That service of process in any action, suit, or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this state during the time the foreign limited liability company was authorized to transact business in this state may thereafter be made on such foreign limited liability company as provided in section 10-01.1-13; and

A mailing address to which a person may mail a copy of any process against the foreign limited liability company.

The filing with the secretary of state of articles of dissolution and termination, or a certificate of merger if the foreign limited liability company is not the surviving organization, from the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which the foreign limited liability company is organized constitutes a valid application of withdrawal and the authority of the foreign limited liability company to transact business in this state shall cease upon filing of the certificate.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.